Louisiana, session 2026, HB111.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 15:828(E) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§828. Classification and treatment programs; qualified sex offender programs;
reports; earned credits
* * *
E. Offenders who are otherwise eligible under pursuant to this Section who
earn a bachelor's or associate's degree from a regionally accredited and a department-
approved educational institution while incarcerated shall be eligible to earn an
additional ninety days of credit toward the reduction of the projected good time
parole supervision date.
* * *
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 1 of 1
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.